test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
  Verbs:
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: läinuvat
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: läinud
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: läinud
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: läinuks
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: läinuksid
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: läinuksite
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: läinuksime
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: läinuksid
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: läinuksin
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: läks
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: läksid
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: läksite
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: läksime
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: läksid
     minema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: läksin
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: läheks
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: läheksid
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: läheksite
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: läheksime
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: läheksid
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: läheksin
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff+Use/Rare: lähme
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: lähe
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: lähed
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: läheb
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: lähen
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: lähete
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: läheme
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: lähevad
     minema+V+Inf: minna
     minema+V+Ger: minnes
     minema+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: minema
     minema+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: minemast
     minema+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: minemas
     minema+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: minemaks
     minema+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: minemata
     minema+V+Pers+Prc: minev
     minema+V+Pers+Quot: minevat
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: mingu
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: minge
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: mingem
     minema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: mine
     minema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: mindud
     minema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: mindud
     minema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: minduks
     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: mindav
     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: mindavat
     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: mindaks
     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: minda
     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: mindagu
     minema+V+Impers+Sup: mindama
     minema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: mindi
     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: minnakse
     minema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff+Use/NotNorm: mindakse
     olema+V+Inf: olla
     olema+V+Ger: olles
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: 'on'
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: 'on'
     olema+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: olema
     olema+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: olemast
     olema+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: olemas
     olema+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: olemaks
     olema+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: olemata
     olema+V+Pers+Prc: olev
     olema+V+Pers+Quot: olevat
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: olgu
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: olge
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: olgem
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: olnuvat
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: olnud
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: olnud
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: olnuks
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: olnuksid
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: olnuksite
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: olnuksime
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: olnuksid
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: olnuksin
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: olid
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: olite
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: olime
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: olid
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: olin
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: oli
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: oleks
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: oleksid
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: oleksite
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: oleksime
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: oleksid
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: oleksin
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: ole
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: ole
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: olen
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: oled
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: oleme
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: olete
     olema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: oldud
     olema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: oldud
     olema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: olduks
     olema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: oldav
     olema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: oldavat
     olema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: oldaks
     olema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: olda
     olema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: oldagu
     olema+V+Impers+Sup: oldama
     olema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: oldi
     olema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff+Use/NotNorm: oldakse
     olema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: ollakse
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: polnud
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Neg: polnuks
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Neg: polnuksid
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Neg: polnuksite
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Neg: polnuksime
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Neg: polnuksid
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Neg: polnuksin
     olema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot+Neg: polnuvat
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Quot+Neg: polevat
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Neg: poleks
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Neg: poleksid
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Neg: poleksin
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Neg: poleksite
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Neg: poleksime
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Neg: poleksid
     olema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: pole
     olema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: poldud
     olema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond+Neg: polduks
     olema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: polda
     olema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond+Neg: poldaks
     olema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot+Neg: poldavat
     aeglema+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: aeglema
     aeglema+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: aeglemast
     aeglema+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: aeglemas
     aeglema+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: aeglemaks
     aeglema+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: aeglemata
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prc: aeglev
     aeglema+V+Pers+Quot: aeglevat
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: aegled
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: aegleks
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: aegleksid
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: aegleksite
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: aegleksime
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: aegleksid
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: aegleksin
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: aeglen
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: aegleme
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: aeglete
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: aeglevad
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: aegleb
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: aegle
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: aegle
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: aegles
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: aeglesid
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: aeglesite
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: aeglesime
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: aeglesid
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: aeglesin
     ambuma+V+Inf: ambuda
     ambuma+V+Ger: ambudes
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: ambus
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: ambusid
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: ambusite
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: ambusime
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: ambusid
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: ambusin
     ambuma+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: ambuma
     ambuma+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: ambumast
     ambuma+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: ambumas
     ambuma+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: ambumaks
     ambuma+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: ambumata
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prc: ambuv
     ambuma+V+Pers+Quot: ambuvat
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: ambunuvat
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: ambunud
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: ambunud
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: ambunuks
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: ambunuksid
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: ambunuksite
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: ambunuksime
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: ambunuksid
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: ambunuksin
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: ambugu
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: ambuge
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: ambugem
     ambuma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: ammutud
     ambuma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: ammutud
     ambuma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: ammutuks
     ambuma+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: ammutav
     ambuma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: ammutavat
     ambuma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: ammutaks
     ambuma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: ammuta
     ambuma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: ammutakse
     ambuma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: ammutagu
     ambuma+V+Impers+Sup: ammutama
     ambuma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: ammuti
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: ammud
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: ammuks
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: ammuksid
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: ammuksite
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: ammuksime
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: ammuksid
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: ammuksin
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: ammun
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: ammume
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: ammute
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: ammuvad
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: ammub
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: ammu
     ambuma+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: ammu
     ajama+V+Inf: ajada
     ajama+V+Ger: ajades
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: ajagu
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: ajage
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: ajagem
     ajama+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: ajama
     ajama+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: ajamast
     ajama+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: ajamas
     ajama+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: ajamaks
     ajama+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: ajamata
     ajama+V+Pers+Prc: ajav
     ajama+V+Pers+Quot: ajavat
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: ajad
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: ajaks
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: ajaksid
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: ajaksite
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: ajaksime
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: ajaksid
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: ajaksin
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: ajan
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: ajame
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: ajate
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: ajavad
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: ajab
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: aja
     ajama+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: aja
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: ajas
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: ajasid
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: ajasite
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: ajasime
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: ajasid
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: ajasin
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: ajanuvat
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: ajanud
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: ajanud
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: ajanuks
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: ajanuksid
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: ajanuksite
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: ajanuksime
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: ajanuksid
     ajama+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: ajanuksin
     ajama+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: aetud
     ajama+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: aetud
     ajama+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: aetuks
     ajama+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: aetav
     ajama+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: aetavat
     ajama+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: aetaks
     ajama+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: aeta
     ajama+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: aetakse
     ajama+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: aetagu
     ajama+V+Impers+Sup: aetama
     ajama+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: aeti
     aeglema+V+Inf: ajelda
     aeglema+V+Ger: ajeldes
     aeglema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: ajeldud
     aeglema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: ajeldud
     aeglema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: ajelduks
     aeglema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: ajeldav
     aeglema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: ajeldavat
     aeglema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: ajeldaks
     aeglema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: ajelda
     aeglema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: ajeldakse
     aeglema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: ajeldagu
     aeglema+V+Impers+Sup: ajeldama
     aeglema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: ajeldi
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: ajelgu
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: ajelge
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: ajelgem
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: ajelnuvat
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: ajelnud
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: ajelnud
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: ajelnuks
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: ajelnuksid
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: ajelnuksite
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: ajelnuksime
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: ajelnuksid
     aeglema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: ajelnuksin
     naerma+V+Inf: naerda
     naerma+V+Ger: naerdes
     naerma+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: naerma
     naerma+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: naermast
     naerma+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: naermas
     naerma+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: naermaks
     naerma+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: naermata
     naerma+V+Pers+Quot: naervat
     naerma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: naersid
     naerma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: naersite
     naerma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: naersime
     naerma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: naersid
     naerma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: naersin
     naerma+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: naernuvat
